Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3176.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 2. Title 24 of the General Laws entitled "HIGHWAYS" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 13.1
CROOK POINT BRIDGE AUTHORITY ACT
24-13.1-1. Creation of corporation — Composition — Personnel — Compensation.
(a) There is hereby created and established an independent public instrumentality and body
corporate and politic with a separate legal existence from the city of Providence and the State of
Rhode Island, having such powers, authority, rights, privileges, and titles as may be necessary and
incidental to the effectuation of the purposes set forth in this chapter, to be known as the “Crook
Point Bridge Authority.” It is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this chapter to
create and establish the corporation for the purposes of acquiring and maintaining the Crook Point
Bascule Bridge and any property appurtenant and/or adjacent thereto, and planning, implementing,
administering, and overseeing any preservation, improvement, expansion and/or redevelopment
initiatives thereof. The exercise by the corporation of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be
deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public and government function. This
chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with the purposes expressed.
(b) The powers of the corporation shall be exercised by a board of directors having three
(3) voting members, all of whom shall be electors of the city of Providence. The directors shall be
appointed by the mayor of the city of Providence subject to approval of the city council. The

chairperson shall be appointed by the mayor and serve at the pleasure of the mayor. The directors
who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms as follows: one director shall have an
initial term of one year; one director shall have an initial term of three (3) years; and one director
shall have an initial term of five (5) years, respectively from the date of their appointment.
Thereafter, all directors shall be appointed for terms of five (5) years, with no term limit.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, each member of the board shall serve until a successor is appointed
and qualified. In the event of a vacancy occurring in the office of a member by death, resignation,
or otherwise, that vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as a regular appointment, but only for
the remainder of the term of the former member. The mayor may remove any director for
misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty.
(c) The board of directors, at its annual meeting, shall elect a secretary and treasurer. A
majority of the members shall constitute a quorum, and any action to be taken by the corporation
under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution approved by a majority of the
members present at any regular or special meeting at which a quorum is present. A vacancy in the
membership of the corporation shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all of the rights
and perform all of the duties of the board of directors. All meetings shall be open to the public, and
all records shall be a matter of public record, except that if a majority of the board of the directors
decides, consistent with the requirements of chapter 46 of title 42 ("open meetings"), that it would
be in the best interest of the corporation and the city and/or the state to hold an executive session
in private, then the board of directors shall be authorized to transact any business as allowable under
law at that executive session in private, and the record of the executive session shall not become a
matter of public record until the transaction discussed has in the opinion of the board of directors
been completed.
(d) No member of the board of directors shall receive compensation for the performance
of their duties under this chapter; however, each member shall be reimbursed for the member's
reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out those duties. Members may engage in private
employment, or in a profession or business, provided that any interests related thereto shall not
materially conflict with the interests of the corporation. No part of the net earnings of the
corporation shall be distributable to, or inure to the benefit of, any private person.
24-13.1-2. Rights and powers of board.
The board of directors shall have all the rights and powers necessary or convenient to carry
out and effectuate the purposes herein, including, without limitation, the rights and powers:
(1) To sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name;
(2) To adopt, use, and alter a corporate seal;
LC004023 - Page 2 of 5

(3) To maintain an office at such place or places as it may designate;
(4) To determine the location, scope and character of any initiative to be pursued under the
provisions of this chapter;
(5) To enter into contracts and make agreements;
(6) To employ in its discretion attorneys, accountants, architectural and engineering
consultants, financial consultants and such other employees and agents as it deems necessary and
to fix their compensation;
(7) To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise hold, real or personal property, or any interest
in real or personal property wherever situated;
(8) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of
all or any part of its property and assets for any consideration and upon any terms and conditions
as the board of directors shall determine;
(9) To make guarantees, issue bonds, incur liabilities and borrow money at any rates of
interest as the board of directors may determine;
(10) To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and at its option to take and hold real
and personal property as security for the payment of funds so loaned or invested;
(11) To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with this chapter, for the administration
and regulation of the affairs of the corporation, and those bylaws may contain provisions
indemnifying any person who is or was a commissioner, officer, employee, or agent of the
corporation; and
(12) To do any and all things necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and exercise
the powers given and granted pursuant to this chapter.
24-13.1-3. Employees.
Employees of the corporation shall not, by reason of their employment, be deemed to be
employees of the city of Providence or the State of Rhode Island for any purpose, notwithstanding
any other provision of the general laws, charter, or ordinance to the contrary.
24-13.1-4. Obligations.
Obligations issued by the corporation shall not constitute a debt, liability, obligation, or
pledge of faith of the city of Providence or the State of Rhode Island, or any political subdivision
thereof other than the corporation itself, but shall be payable solely from the revenues and/or assets
of the corporation.
24-13.1-5. Taxes.
The corporation shall not be required to pay state taxes of any kind and the corporation, its
properties, monies, bonds, and notes issued by it and the income therefrom will at all times be free
LC004023 - Page 3 of 5

from taxation of every kind by the state.
24-13.1-6. Expendables and disbursements .
(a) The corporation shall at all times keep full and accurate accounts of its receipts,
expenditures, disbursements, assets, and liabilities, which shall be open to inspection by any officer
or duly appointed agent of the city. The corporation shall report annually on:
(1) Its finances; and
(2) On the activities undertaken, the progress made in meeting goals and objectives set
forth in its plans, and its proposed activities for the next year.
(b) Copies of annual reports required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the mayor and the city council.
(c) The corporation shall conform with chapter 46 of title 42 (“open meetings”), and
chapter 2 of title 38 (“access to public records”), in the same manner as required of the city, and
the board of directors and the employees of the corporation shall be subject to the code of ethics
set forth in chapter 14 of title 36 ("codes of ethics”).
24-13.1-7. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter, or its application to any circumstances, shall be held
unlawful by any court of competent jurisdiction, that decision shall not affect nor impair the validity
of the application of those provisions to other circumstances or the validity of any of the other
provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004023
========
LC004023 - Page 4 of 5